Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.300

Agreements with other governmental entities.

The director is authorized to cooperate with and enter into agreements with any other agency of the state, the United States, and any other state or agency thereof for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and securing uniformity of regulation.

[ 1961 c 249 s 30.]